District of Columbia statutes.
3-515

Repealed

Penalties.

Repealed.

Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-171, § 16, 29 DCR 5297
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 3, 38 DCR 314
Mar. 26, 2014, D.C. Law 20-96, § 401(a), 61 DCR 1184
Section 401(b) of D.C. Law 20-96 provided that rules promulgated pursuant to Chapter 5 of this title shall remain in effect until the Mayor promulgates rules to implement this subchapter.